Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-218
Animals at large; regulation; penalty.

A city of the primary class shall have the power, by ordinance, to regulate or prohibit the running at large of cattle, hogs, horses, mules, sheep, goats, dogs, and other animals and to cause such animals running at large to be impounded and sold to discharge the cost and penalties provided for violation of such prohibitions, and the fees and expenses of impounding and keeping such animals and of such sale.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXII, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 4432;

C.S.1922, § 3816;

C.S.1929, § 15-219;

R.S.1943, § 15-218;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 35.